Florida, session 2026, SB1028.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 92 93 Section 1.âParagraph (oo) is added to subsection (6) of 94 section 627.351, Florida Statutes, to read: 95 627.351âInsurance risk apportionment plans.â 96 (6)âCITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.â 97 (oo)âFor commercial residential and commercial 98 nonresidential risks submitted through the commercial lines 99 clearinghouse pursuant to s. 627.3518, if an approved surplus 100 lines clearinghouse insurer offers comparable coverage as 101 defined in s. 627.3518(1) and the total cost of insurance 102 coverage for the specific risk is not more than 15 percent 103 greater than the corporationâs total cost of insurance coverage 104 for the specific risk, the corporation may not issue new 105 coverage unless otherwise provided in s. 627.3518(10). For 106 purposes of this paragraph, the term âtotal cost of insurance 107 coverage for the specific riskâ means the aggregate annual 108 premium, plus all fees, taxes, assessments, surcharges, and any 109 other mandatory charges that a policyholder must pay to maintain 110 coverage for the entirety of the proposed policy period. 111 Section 2.âSection 627.3518, Florida Statutes, is amended 112 to read: 113 627.3518âCitizens Property Insurance Corporation 114 policyholder eligibility clearinghouse program.âThe purpose of 115 this section is to provide a framework for the corporation to 116 implement a clearinghouse program by January 1, 2014. 117 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 118 (a)ââApplicable program standardsâ means the insurer 119 participation eligibility criteria, contractual requirements, 120 and account clearance requirements the commercial lines 121 clearinghouse administrator and the corporation deem necessary 122 to ensure an orderly process for offers of comparable coverage 123 to be provided by approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurers. 124 (b)ââApproved surplus lines clearinghouse insurerâ means an 125 eligible surplus lines insurer pursuant to s. 626.918 which has 126 a financial strength rating of âA-â or higher and a financial 127 size category of A-VII or higher from A.M. Best Company which 128 the clearinghouse administrator recommends for participation in 129 the program and which the office verifies meets the applicable 130 program standards for participation in the program within 30 131 business days after the commercial lines clearinghouse 132 administratorâs recommendation. If the office does not complete 133 such verification within the 30-business-day period, the insurer 134 is deemed verified for purposes of participation in the program. 135 (c)ââAuthorized insurerâ means an insurer authorized to act 136 as an insurer by a subsisting certificate of authority issued to 137 the insurer by the office. 138 (d)ââCommercial lines clearinghouse administratorâ means an 139 individual or entity employed or otherwise contracted by the 140 corporation to provide administrative or professional services 141 to implement the commercial lines clearinghouse for authorized 142 insurance or the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus 143 lines insurance within the corporation as set forth in paragraph 144 (3)(b). 145 (e)ââCommercial lines clearinghouse for authorized 146 insuranceâ means the clearinghouse program established under 147 subparagraph (2)(b)2. 148 (f)ââCommercial lines clearinghouse for surplus lines 149 insuranceâ means the clearinghouse program established under 150 subparagraph (2)(b)1. 151 (g)ââComparable coverageâ means, for purposes of the 152 commercial lines clearinghouse for authorized insurance and the 153 commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance, 154 coverage that is equivalent to or better than coverage from the 155 corporation as to all aspects of such coverage, as determined by 156 the corporation through the clearinghouse process and applicable 157 program standards. Administrative, procedural, and other such 158 terms and conditions may not be considered when assessing 159 comparable coverage. 160 (h)ââCorporationâ means the Citizens Property Insurance 161 Corporation. 162 (i)(b)ââExclusive agentâ means any licensed insurance agent 163 that has, by contract, agreed to act exclusively for one company 164 or group of affiliated insurance companies and is disallowed by 165 the provisions of that contract to directly write for any other 166 unaffiliated insurer absent express consent from the company or 167 group of affiliated insurance companies. 168 (j)(c)ââIndependent agentâ means any licensed insurance 169 agent not described in paragraph (i) (b). 170 (k)ââPersonal lines clearinghouseâ means the clearinghouse 171 program established under paragraph (2)(a). 172 (l)ââPrimary residenceâ has the same meaning as in s. 173 627.351(6)(c)2.a. 174 (m)(d)ââProgramâ means the clearinghouses clearinghouse 175 created under this section, consisting of the personal lines 176 clearinghouse, the commercial lines clearinghouse for authorized 177 insurance, and the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus 178 lines insurance. 179 (n)ââSurplus lines agentâ means an insurance agent licensed 180 pursuant to s. 626.927 or s. 626.9272. 181 (o)ââTotal cost of the coverage for the specific riskâ 182 means the aggregate annual premium, plus all fees, taxes, 183 assessments, surcharges, and any other mandatory charges that a 184 policyholder must pay to maintain coverage over the entirety of 185 the proposed policy period. 186 (2)(a)âThe corporation shall establish a personal lines 187 clearinghouse in order to confirm an applicantâs eligibility 188 with the corporation, and to enhance access of new applicants 189 for personal lines coverage and existing personal lines 190 policyholders of the corporation to offers of coverage from 191 authorized insurers, and the corporation shall establish a 192 program for personal residential risks in order to facilitate 193 the diversion of ineligible applicants and existing 194 policyholders from the corporation into the voluntary insurance 195 market. 196 (b)1.âTo facilitate the diversion of applicants and 197 existing policyholders from the corporation to approved surplus 198 lines clearinghouse insurers, the corporation shall amend its 199 plan of operation and implement on or before January 1, 2027, a 200 separate commercial lines clearinghouse pursuant to this 201 subparagraph in order to enhance access to offers of coverage 202 from approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurers for new 203 applicants for commercial residential coverage and commercial 204 nonresidential coverage and existing commercial residential and 205 commercial nonresidential policyholders of the corporation. 206 2.âTo facilitate the diversion of ineligible applicants and 207 existing policyholders from the corporation to authorized 208 insurers, the corporation shall implement, on or before January 209 1, 2027, a separate commercial lines clearinghouse pursuant to 210 this subparagraph to confirm eligibility for coverage from the 211 corporation and to enhance access to offers of coverage from 212 authorized insurers for new applicants for commercial 213 residential and commercial nonresidential coverage and existing 214 commercial residential and commercial nonresidential 215 policyholders of the corporation. If no offer of comparable 216 coverage from an authorized insurer through the program at a 217 premium that is at or below the eligibility threshold is made 218 through the commercial lines clearinghouse for authorized 219 insurance pursuant to this subparagraph within 5 days after 220 receipt of a submission, the risk shall be eligible for 221 submission to the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus 222 lines insurance The corporation shall also develop appropriate 223 procedures for facilitating the diversion of ineligible 224 applicants and existing policyholders for commercial residential 225 coverage into the private insurance market and shall report such 226 procedures to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 227 House of Representatives by January 1, 2014. 228 (3)âThe corporation board shall establish the clearinghouse 229 program as an organizational unit within the corporation. The 230 program shall have all the rights and responsibilities in 231 carrying out its duties as a licensed general lines agent and a 232 surplus lines agent and may, but is not may not be required to, 233 employ or engage a licensed general lines agent or a surplus 234 lines agent, or to maintain an insurance agency license to carry 235 out its activities in the solicitation and placement of 236 insurance coverage. In establishing the program, the corporation 237 has all of the following rights and responsibilities may: 238 (a)âBefore binding or renewing coverage by the corporation, 239 the corporation: 240 1.âShall require all new applications for personal lines 241 coverage, and all personal lines policies due for renewal, to be 242 submitted for coverage to the program in order to facilitate 243 obtaining an offer of coverage from an authorized insurer. 244 2.âMust, when the corporation establishes a commercial 245 lines clearinghouse for authorized insurance, require all new 246 applications for commercial lines coverage, and all commercial 247 lines policies due for renewal, to be initially submitted for 248 coverage to the commercial lines clearinghouse for authorized 249 insurance in order to facilitate obtaining an offer of coverage 250 from an authorized insurer. The commercial lines clearinghouse 251 for authorized insurance shall serve as the single initial point 252 of intake in order to facilitate obtaining an offer of coverage 253 from an authorized insurer. 254 3.âMust, when the corporation establishes a commercial 255 lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance, require all new 256 applications for commercial lines coverage, and all commercial 257 lines policies due for renewal, following the completion of the 258 process described in subparagraph 2., to be submitted for 259 coverage to the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus lines 260 insurance in order to facilitate obtaining an offer of coverage 261 from an approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurer. The 262 commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance shall 263 serve as the single point of intake for the commercial lines 264 clearinghouse in order to facilitate obtaining an offer of 265 coverage from an approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurer 266 before the corporation may quote, bind, or otherwise indicate or 267 offer coverage. This paragraph may not prevent an insured from 268 submitting at any time an application to the commercial lines 269 clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance seeking noncomparable 270 coverage from approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurers as 271 authorized by paragraph (5)(f) before binding or renewing 272 coverage by the corporation. 273 (b)âShall establish and maintain the operational systems 274 and procedures necessary to implement the program. 275 (c)âShall employ or otherwise contract with individuals or 276 other entities for appropriate administrative or professional 277 services to effectuate the plan within the corporation in 278 accordance with the applicable purchasing requirements under s. 279 627.351 and, for purposes of implementing the commercial lines 280 clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance for providing offers 281 of coverage from approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurers 282 on or before January 1, 2027, may contract with such individuals 283 or entities in accordance with s. 287.057. 284 (d)(c)âMay enter into contracts with any authorized insurer 285 and any approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurer to 286 participate in the program and accept an appointment by such 287 insurer. 288 (e)(d)âMay provide funds to operate the personal lines 289 clearinghouse and the commercial lines clearinghouse for 290 authorized insurance program. Insurers and agents participating 291 in the personal lines clearinghouse or the commercial lines 292 clearinghouse for authorized insurance program are not required 293 to pay a fee to offset or partially offset the cost of the 294 program or use the program for renewal of policies initially 295 written through the clearinghouse. 296 (f)âShall separately operate and fund pursuant to paragraph 297 (h) the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus lines 298 insurance and shall separately operate and fund pursuant to 299 paragraph (e) the commercial lines clearinghouse for authorized 300 insurance. 301 (g)âMust, if there is insufficient commercial support for 302 any commercial lines clearinghouse, be relieved of its 303 obligations with respect to that commercial lines clearinghouse 304 until such time there is sufficient commercial support. 305 (h)âShall provide or permit access to shared or hosted 306 technology, systems, interfaces, or applications programming 307 interfaces to the commercial lines clearinghouse administrator, 308 provided that each retains operational control over and 309 responsibility for its own technology, systems, interfaces, or 310 applications. Notwithstanding paragraph (e), the corporation may 311 not provide funds to support or offset the infrastructure or 312 operations of the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus 313 lines insurance or any component thereof, but shall fund and 314 operate its own technology, systems, interfaces, or applications 315 as necessary for the corporation to access and interface with 316 the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance. 317 (i)(e)âMay develop an enhanced application that includes 318 information to assist private insurers in determining whether to 319 make an offer of coverage through the program. 320 (j)(f)âFor personal lines residential risks, may require 321 that, before approving all new applications for coverage by the 322 corporation, that every application be subject to a period of 2 323 business days when any insurer participating in the personal 324 lines clearinghouse program may select the application for 325 coverage. For commercial lines residential and commercial lines 326 nonresidential risks, the corporation must require, before 327 approving all new applications for commercial lines coverage by 328 the corporation, that every application be subject to an initial 329 period of 5 business days when any authorized insurer 330 participating in the commercial lines clearinghouse for 331 authorized insurance may select the application for coverage. 332 The authorized insurer may issue a binder on any policy selected 333 for coverage for a period of at least 30 days but not more than 334 60 days. 335 (k)âShall, in creating the commercial lines clearinghouse 336 for authorized insurance and the commercial lines clearinghouse 337 for surplus lines insurance, establish criteria to determine the 338 capabilities necessary for the commercial lines clearinghouse 339 administrators. For facilitating offers of surplus lines 340 coverage, such criteria must include confirmed expertise in the 341 surplus lines market, at least 5 years of publicly available 342 audited financial statements, the ability to facilitate all 343 approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurers to participate in 344 the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance, 345 and other criteria that the corporation determines necessary to 346 effectively and timely establish and administer the commercial 347 lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance, manage offers 348 of surplus lines coverage through the commercial lines 349 clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance, and the ability to 350 collect and remit, either directly or through a surplus lines 351 agent, all taxes pursuant to s. 626.932 and service fees 352 pursuant to s. 626.9325. 353 (l)âShall select a commercial lines clearinghouse 354 administrator for the commercial lines clearinghouse for 355 authorized insurance and a separate commercial lines 356 clearinghouse administrator for the commercial lines 357 clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance within 90 days after 358 the effective date of this act. 359 (m)âShall allow the commercial lines clearinghouse 360 administrators to establish applicable program standards and 361 procedures to ensure an orderly process for offers of coverage 362 to be provided by authorized insurers or approved surplus lines 363 clearinghouse insurers, including engagement of or with surplus 364 lines agents or managing general agents or managing general 365 underwriters pursuant to paragraph (5)(h), participating in the 366 commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance. 367 (n)âShall submit to the commercial lines clearinghouse 368 administrator for the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus 369 lines insurance its coverage terms and conditions, deductible 370 structures, total cost of insurance coverage for the specific 371 risk, the currently approved rate applicable to the risk, and 372 the premium that would be charged after application of s. 373 627.351(6)(n)5. The commercial lines clearinghouse administrator 374 shall disclose the total cost of insurance coverage to 375 participating approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurers 376 following the commercial lines clearinghouse administratorâs 377 receipt of a comparable coverage offer from such participating 378 approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurer. Any change to the 379 corporationâs coverage terms and conditions, deductible 380 structures, rating classification, total cost of insurance 381 coverage for the specific risk, or rating factor constitutes a 382 new submission and restarts the validation period. The 383 commercial lines clearinghouse administrator for the commercial 384 lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance shall enter into 385 agreements with approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurers 386 participating in the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus 387 lines insurance. 388 (4)âThe corporation shall share risk exposure and policy 389 information with the commercial lines clearinghouse 390 administrator for the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus 391 lines insurance and, through the commercial lines clearinghouse 392 for surplus lines insurance, the commercial lines clearinghouse 393 administrator for the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus 394 lines insurance may use such information as necessary to operate 395 and administer the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus 396 lines insurance and ensure the orderly, timely, and transparent 397 assessment of risks by approved surplus lines clearinghouse 398 insurers participating in the commercial lines clearinghouse for 399 surplus lines insurance. This subsection does not prohibit a 400 commercial lines clearinghouse administrator from sharing risk 401 information with approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurers 402 for underwriting evaluation. Any risk information shared for 403 purposes of this subsection, other than a submission of coverage 404 for a specific risk, must be aggregated and deidentified. 405 (5)âAny authorized insurer may participate in the personal 406 lines clearinghouse or the commercial lines clearinghouse for 407 authorized insurance program; however, participation is not 408 mandatory for any insurer. Approved surplus lines clearinghouse 409 insurers may participate in the commercial lines clearinghouse 410 for surplus lines insurance but may not participate in the 411 personal lines clearinghouse or the commercial lines 412 clearinghouse for authorized insurance; however, participation 413 is not mandatory for any surplus lines insurer. Insurers making 414 offers of coverage to new applicants or renewal policyholders 415 through the program: 416 (a)âMay not be required to individually appoint any agent 417 whose customer is underwritten and bound through the program. 418 Notwithstanding s. 626.112, insurers are not required to appoint 419 any agent on a policy underwritten through the program for as 420 long as that policy remains with the insurer. Insurers may, at 421 their election, appoint any agent or surplus lines agent whose 422 direct or indirect customer is initially underwritten and bound 423 through the program. In the event an insurer accepts a policy 424 from an agent who is not appointed pursuant to this paragraph, 425 and thereafter elects to accept a policy from such agent, the 426 provisions of s. 626.112 requiring appointment apply to the 427 agent. 428 (b)âMust enter into a limited agency agreement with each 429 agent or surplus lines agent that is not appointed in accordance 430 with paragraph (a) and whose direct or indirect customer is 431 underwritten and bound through the program. In addition, a 432 surplus lines agent that enters into a limited agency or broker 433 agreement with an approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurer 434 making an offer of coverage through the program must also enter 435 into a limited agency or broker agreement with each producing 436 agent whose customer is underwritten and bound through the 437 program. 438 (c)âMust enter into its standard agency agreement with each 439 agent or surplus lines agent whose direct or indirect customer 440 is underwritten and bound through the program when that agent or 441 surplus lines agent has been appointed by the insurer pursuant 442 to s. 626.112. In addition, a surplus lines agent that enters 443 into a standard agency or broker agreement with an approved 444 surplus lines clearinghouse insurer making an offer of coverage 445 through the program must also enter into a limited agency or 446 broker agreement with each producing agent whose customer is 447 underwritten and bound through the program. 448 (d)âMust comply with s. 627.4133(2). 449 (e)âMay participate through their designated single 450 designated managing general agent, managing general underwriter, 451 or broker, or surplus lines agent; however, the provisions of 452 paragraph (7)(a) (6)(a) regarding ownership, control, and use of 453 the expirations continue to apply. 454 (f)âMay make offers of coverage through the commercial 455 lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance other than 456 comparable coverage, as long as such noncomparable offers of 457 coverage are clearly designated as noncomparable. Such 458 noncomparable offers of coverage are outside of the program and 459 not subject to s. 627.351(6)(oo). 460 (g)(f)âFor authorized insurers, must pay to the producing 461 agent a commission equal to that paid by the corporation or the 462 usual and customary commission paid by the insurer for that line 463 of business, whichever is greater. 464 (h)âFor approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurers, when 465 coverage is placed through the commercial lines clearinghouse 466 for surplus lines insurance, directly or through a managing 467 general agent or managing general underwriter, must pay a total 468 commission or equivalent compensation on gross written premium, 469 exclusive of fees, surcharges, and taxes, to the surplus lines 470 agent placing the risk. The surplus lines agent must pay the 471 producing agent a commission that results in an effective 472 commission percentage at least equal to the commission 473 percentage published by the corporation and in effect on January 474 1, 2026, calculated in the same manner and on the same basis 475 used by the corporation, and shall retain the remainder of the 476 total commission or equivalent compensation. This paragraph does 477 not prohibit an agent from voluntarily accepting a lower 478 commission at the agentâs sole discretion. As used in this 479 paragraph, the term âeffective commission percentageâ means the 480 commission expressed as a percentage of premium, exclusive of 481 all fees, assessments, surcharges, and taxes. 482 (6)(a)(5)âNotwithstanding s. 627.3517, any applicant for 483 new personal lines coverage from the corporation is not eligible 484 for coverage from the corporation if provided an offer of 485 coverage from an authorized insurer through the program at a 486 premium that is at or below the eligibility threshold for 487 applicants for new coverage of a primary residence established 488 in s. 627.351(6)(c)5.a., or for applicants for new coverage of a 489 risk that is not a primary residence established in s. 490 627.351(6)(c)5.b. Whenever an offer of coverage for a personal 491 lines risk is received for a policyholder of the corporation at 492 renewal from an authorized insurer through the program which is 493 at or below the eligibility threshold for primary residences of 494 policyholders of the corporation established in s. 495 627.351(6)(c)5.a., or the eligibility threshold for risks that 496 are not primary residences of policyholders of the corporation 497 established in s. 627.351(6)(c)5.b., the risk is not eligible 498 for coverage with the corporation. In the event an offer of 499 coverage for a new applicant is received from an authorized 500 insurer through the program, and the premium offered exceeds the 501 eligibility threshold for applicants for new coverage of a 502 primary residence established in s. 627.351(6)(c)5.a., or the 503 eligibility threshold for applicants for new coverage on a risk 504 that is not a primary residence established in s. 505 627.351(6)(c)5.b., the applicant or insured may elect to accept 506 such coverage, or may elect to accept or continue coverage with 507 the corporation. In the event an offer of coverage for a 508 personal lines risk is received from an authorized insurer at 509 renewal through the program, and the premium offered exceeds the 510 eligibility threshold for primary residences of policyholders of 511 the corporation established in s. 627.351(6)(c)5.a., or exceeds 512 the eligibility threshold for risks that are not primary 513 residences of policyholders of the corporation established in s. 514 627.351(6)(c)5.b., the insured may elect to accept such 515 coverage, or may elect to accept or continue coverage with the 516 corporation. Section 627.351(6)(c)5.a.(I) and b.(I) does not 517 apply to an offer of coverage from an authorized insurer 518 obtained through the program. As used in this subsection, the 519 term âprimary residenceâ has the same meaning as in s. 520 627.351(6)(c)2.a. 521 (b)âAny applicant for new or renewal commercial lines 522 nonresidential coverage from the corporation is not eligible for 523 coverage from the corporation if provided an offer of comparable 524 coverage from an authorized insurer through the program. Any 525 applicant for new commercial lines residential coverage from the 526 corporation is not eligible for coverage from the corporation if 527 provided an offer of comparable coverage from an authorized 528 insurer through the program at a premium that is at or below the 529 eligibility threshold for applicants for new coverage 530 established in s. 627.351(6)(c)5.c. The determination of whether 531 an offer of comparable coverage from an authorized insurer 532 through the program is at or below the eligibility threshold 533 must be made before the submission of the corporationâs coverage 534 terms and conditions, deductible structures, and unalterable 535 indicated total cost of insurance for the specific risk is 536 provided to the commercial lines clearinghouse administrator. 537 Whenever an offer of comparable coverage for a commercial lines 538 residential risk is received for a policyholder of the 539 corporation at renewal from an authorized insurer through the 540 program which is at or below the eligibility threshold in s. 541 627.351(6)(c)5.c., the risk is not eligible for coverage from 542 the corporation. In the event that an offer of coverage for a 543 new applicant is received from an authorized insurer through the 544 program, and the premium offered exceeds the eligibility 545 threshold established in s. 627.351(6)(c)5.c., the applicant or 546 insured may elect to accept such coverage or may elect to accept 547 or continue coverage with the corporation. In the event that an 548 offer of coverage for a commercial lines residential risk is 549 received from an authorized insurer at renewal through the 550 program, and the premium offered exceeds the eligibility 551 threshold for policyholders of the corporation established in s. 552 627.351(6)(c)5.c., the insured may elect to accept such coverage 553 or may elect to accept or continue coverage with the 554 corporation. Section 627.351(6)(c)5.c.(I) does not apply to an 555 offer of coverage from an authorized insurer obtained through 556 the program. 557 (c)âAny applicant for new commercial lines residential 558 coverage or commercial lines nonresidential coverage from the 559 corporation and any policyholder of the corporation, when such 560 applicant or corporation policyholder is offered commercial 561 lines residential or commercial lines nonresidential coverage 562 pursuant to the program by an approved surplus lines 563 clearinghouse insurer, becomes ineligible for coverage from the 564 corporation if an approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurer 565 offers comparable coverage and the total cost of insurance 566 coverage for the specific risk is not more than 15 percent 567 greater than the total cost of insurance coverage for the 568 specific risk from the corporation. In the event that an offer 569 of coverage for a new applicant or policyholder of the 570 corporation is received from an approved surplus lines 571 clearinghouse insurer through the program, and the total cost of 572 insurance coverage is more than 15 percent greater than the 573 total cost of insurance coverage for the specific risk from the 574 corporation, the applicant or policyholder of the corporation 575 may elect to accept such coverage or may elect to accept or 576 continue coverage with the corporation. Section 577 627.351(6)(c)5.c.(I) does not apply to an offer of coverage from 578 an approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurer obtained through 579 the program. 580 (7)(6)âIndependent insurance agents submitting new 581 applications for coverage or that are the agent of record on a 582 renewal policy submitted to the program: 583 (a)âAre granted and must maintain ownership and the 584 exclusive use of expirations, records, or other written or 585 electronic information directly related to such applications or 586 renewals written through the corporation or through an insurer 587 participating in the program, notwithstanding s. 627.351(5)(a), 588 s. 627.351(6)(c)5.a.(I)(B) and (II)(B), or s. 589 627.351(6)(c)5.b.(I)(B) and (II)(B). Such ownership is granted 590 for as long as the insured remains with the agency or until sold 591 or surrendered in writing by the agent. Contracts with the 592 corporation or required by the corporation or with any insurer 593 or surplus lines agent may must not amend, modify, interfere 594 with, or limit such rights of ownership. Such expirations, 595 records, or other written or electronic information may be used 596 to review an application, issue a policy, or for any other 597 purpose necessary for placing such business through the program. 598 (b)âMay not be required to be appointed by any insurer 599 participating in the program for policies written solely through 600 the program, notwithstanding the provisions of s. 626.112. 601 (c)âMay accept an appointment from any insurer 602 participating in the program. 603 (d)âMay enter into either a standard or limited agency 604 agreement with the insurer, at the insurerâs option, and may 605 enter into agreements with a surplus lines agent. 606 607 Applicants ineligible for coverage in accordance with subsection 608 (6) (5) remain ineligible if their independent agent is 609 unwilling or unable to enter into a standard or limited agency 610 agreement with an insurer participating in the program. 611 (8)(7)âExclusive agents submitting new applications for 612 coverage or that are the agent of record on a renewal policy 613 submitted to the program: 614 (a)âMust maintain ownership and the exclusive use of 615 expirations, records, or other written or electronic information 616 directly related to such applications or renewals written 617 through the corporation or through an insurer participating in 618 the program, notwithstanding s. 627.351(6)(c)5.a.(I)(B) and 619 (II)(B) or s. 627.351(6)(c)5.b.(I)(B) and (II)(B). Contracts 620 with the corporation or required by the corporation must not 621 amend, modify, interfere with, or limit such rights of 622 ownership. Such expirations, records, or other written or 623 electronic information may be used to review an application, 624 issue a policy, or for any other purpose necessary for placing 625 such business through the program. 626 (b)âMay not be required to be appointed by any insurer 627 participating in the program for policies written solely through 628 the program, notwithstanding the provisions of s. 626.112. 629 (c)âMust only facilitate the placement of an offer of 630 coverage from an insurer whose limited servicing agreement is 631 approved by that exclusive agentâs exclusive insurer. 632 (d)âMay enter into a limited servicing agreement with the 633 insurer making an offer of coverage, and only after the 634 exclusive agentâs insurer has approved the limited servicing 635 agreement terms. The exclusive agentâs insurer must approve a 636 limited service agreement for the program for any insurer for 637 which it has approved a service agreement for other purposes. 638 639 Applicants ineligible for coverage in accordance with subsection 640 (6) (5) remain ineligible if their exclusive agent is unwilling 641 or unable to enter into a standard or limited agency agreement 642 with an insurer making an offer of coverage to that applicant. 643 (9)(8)âSubmission of an application for coverage by the 644 corporation to the program does not constitute the binding of 645 coverage by the corporation, and failure of the program to 646 obtain an offer of coverage by an insurer may not be considered 647 acceptance of coverage of the risk by the corporation. 648 (10)(9)âThe 45-day notice of nonrenewal requirement set 649 forth in s. 627.4133(2)(b)5. applies when a policy is nonrenewed 650 by the corporation because the risk has received an offer of 651 coverage from an authorized insurer pursuant to this section 652 which renders the risk ineligible for coverage by the 653 corporation. Section 627.4133 does not apply when a policy is 654 nonrenewed by the corporation because the risk has received an 655 offer of coverage from an approved surplus lines clearinghouse 656 insurer pursuant to this section which renders the risk 657 ineligible for coverage by the corporation. Within 5 days after 658 the date an approved surplus lines clearinghouse insurer makes 659 an offer of coverage pursuant to this section which renders the 660 risk ineligible for coverage by the corporation, the commercial 661 lines clearinghouse administrator for the commercial lines 662 clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance must, on behalf of the 663 corporation, give the first-named insured written notice of 664 nonrenewal stating the reason as to why the policy is not to be 665 renewed. If the commercial lines clearinghouse administrator for 666 the commercial lines clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance 667 fails to provide the notice as required by this paragraph, 668 paragraph (6)(c) does not apply to the risk. 669 (10)âThe program may not include commercial nonresidential 670 policies. 671 (11)âProprietary business information provided to the 672 corporationâs clearinghouse by insurers with respect to 673 identifying and selecting risks for an offer of coverage is 674 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 675 of the State Constitution. 676 (a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âproprietary 677 business informationâ means information, regardless of form or 678 characteristics, which is owned or controlled by an insurer and: 679 1.âIs identified by the insurer as proprietary business 680 information and is intended to be and is treated by the insurer 681 as private in that the disclosure of the information would cause 682 harm to the insurer, an individual, or the companyâs business 683 operations and has not been disclosed unless disclosed pursuant 684 to a statutory requirement, an order of a court or 685 administrative body, or a private agreement that provides that 686 the information will not be released to the public; 687 2.âIs not otherwise readily ascertainable or publicly 688 available by proper means by other persons from another source 689 in the same configuration as provided to the clearinghouse; and 690 3.âIncludes: 691 a.âTrade secrets, as defined in s. 688.002. 692 b.âInformation relating to competitive interests, the 693 disclosure of which would impair the competitive business of the 694 provider of the information. 695 696 Proprietary business information may be found in underwriting 697 criteria or instructions which are used to identify and select 698 risks through the program for an offer of coverage and are 699 shared with the clearinghouse to facilitate the shopping of 700 risks with the insurer. 701 (b)âThe clearinghouse may disclose confidential and exempt 702 proprietary business information: 703 1.âIf the insurer to which it pertains gives prior written 704 consent; 705 2.âPursuant to a court order; or 706 3.âTo another state agency in this or another state or to a 707 federal agency if the recipient agrees in writing to maintain 708 the confidential and exempt status of the document, material, or 709 other information and has verified in writing its legal 710 authority to maintain such confidentiality. 711 (12)âWithin 3 months after the effective date of this act 712 and annually thereafter, unless waived by the office in its sole 713 discretion, the office shall review and approve the program 714 through a final order. At a minimum, the office must 715 specifically approve all of the following items: 716 (a)âThe applicable program standards. 717 (b)âProcedural rules, which shall provide for the efficient 718 operation of all clearinghouses and allow sufficient time for 719 participating surplus lines insurers to consider and quote 720 risks. 721 (c)âAny contractual agreement relating to the program 722 between any combination of the following: the corporation, any 723 commercial lines clearinghouse administrator, or any approved 724 surplus lines clearinghouse insurer. 725 (d)âThe operational processes used by any commercial lines 726 clearinghouse administrator to determine comparable coverage or 727 whether an offer of coverage from an insurer participating in 728 the program precludes coverage from the corporation. 729 (e)âApplicable controls relating to data and proprietary 730 business information used in the program which do not otherwise 731 conflict with this statute. 732 733 Changes to the items described in this subsection must be 734 approved in writing by the office. 735 (13)âThe corporation may not apply discretionary rate 736 adjustments to specific risks submitted to the commercial lines 737 clearinghouse for surplus lines insurance. 738 (14)âThis section does not authorize rebates or any 739 activity that would violate part IX of chapter 626. The 740 corporation and each commercial lines clearinghouse 741 administrator shall implement procedures to ensure that 742 participating agents and insurers are not induced to violate 743 part IX of chapter 626. 744 Section 3.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 745 replace the phrase âthe effective date of this actâ wherever it 746 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law. 747 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.